Florida, session 2026, SB106.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSection 944.092, Florida Statutes, is created to 15 read: 16 944.092âBasic rights of inmates.â 17 (1)âRIGHTS.âEach inmate in the correctional system has the 18 right to: 19 (a)âProper ventilation.âAll housing units must have air 20 conditioning systems or air-cooling systems; however, housing 21 units in use on or before July 1, 2026, which cannot be fitted 22 for air-conditioning or air-cooling systems must receive exhaust 23 and air circulators sufficient to provide a safe and healthful 24 environment for inmates. 25 (b)âSufficient meal time.âInmates must receive a minimum of 26 20 minutes to eat each meal. The minimum time must be extended 27 to the amount necessary for an inmate to complete the meal if 28 the inmate receives an approved medical reason for an extension. 29 (c)âAdequate food supply in case of emergency.âEach 30 correctional institution shall establish a program with one or 31 more community food banks located near the institution to ensure 32 that an adequate food supply is made available to the inmate 33 population in the event that conditions exist that prevent 34 regular food supply services due to an event such as a natural 35 disaster or other emergency. 36 (d)âNecessary health supplies.âThe department shall provide 37 all of the following: 38 1.âNecessary personal protective equipment for medical 39 staff at all times and for all staff and inmates during health 40 crises or during any cleaning. 41 2.âNecessary health products for inmates, including, but 42 not limited to, sanitary napkins, tampons, soap, and toothpaste, 43 upon the request of inmates. 44 (2)âNOTICE.âThe department shall provide a written copy of 45 the rights established in this section to each inmate upon his 46 or her entry into the correctional system. 47 (3)âGRIEVANCES.âAn inmate may file a grievance with the 48 department if the inmate believes a right guaranteed in this 49 section is denied by a correctional institution. 50 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 51 947.149, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 52 947.149âConditional medical release.â 53 (1)âThe commission shall, in conjunction with the 54 department, establish the conditional medical release program. 55 An inmate is eligible for consideration for release under the 56 conditional medical release program when the inmate, because of 57 an existing medical or physical condition, is determined by the 58 department to be within one of the following designations: 59 (a)ââPermanently incapacitated inmate,â which means an 60 inmate who has a condition caused by injury, disease, or illness 61 which, to a reasonable degree of medical certainty, renders the 62 inmate permanently and irreversibly physically incapacitated, or 63 who has a physical disability, impairment, or handicap, to the 64 extent that the inmate does not constitute a danger to herself 65 or himself or others. 66 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.